Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-401
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-401 to 9-437 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 122;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 44;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 94;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 37;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 20.
July 1, 2026